ko: 기어 변속 노브 조명: 백라이트 시프트 패턴; 광섬유; 야광; LED(RGB); LED(단색); 없음; 기타
sv: Växelknoppens belysning: Bakgrundsbelyst växelmönster; Fiberoptisk; Självlysande; LED (RGB); LED (enfärgad); Ingen; Övrigt
fi: Vaihdekepin nupin valaistus: Taustavalaistu vaihdekaavio; Kuituoptinen; Pimeässä hohtava; LED (RGB); LED (yksivärinen); Ei mitään; Muu
pl: Podświetlenie gałki zmiany biegów: Podświetlany schemat biegów; Światłowodowe; Świecące w ciemności; LED (RGB); LED (jednokolorowe); Brak; Inne
sk-SK: Osvetlenie radiacej páky: Podsvietená schéma radenia; Optické vlákno; Svietiace v tme; LED (RGB); LED (jednofarebné); Žiadne; Iné
zh-CN: 换挡旋钮照明: 档位图案背光; 光纤; 夜光; LED（RGB）; LED（单色）; 无; 其他
es: Iluminación de la palanca de cambios: Patrón de cambios retroiluminado; Fibra óptica; Brilla en la oscuridad; LED (RGB); LED (monocolor); Ninguno; Otro
ru: Подсветка рукоятки переключения передач: Подсветка схемы переключения; Оптоволоконная; Светящаяся в темноте; Светодиодная (RGB); Светодиодная (одноцветная); Нет; Другое
zh-TW: 排檔頭照明: 背光換檔圖案; 光纖; 夜光; LED (RGB); LED (單色); 無; 其他
hu: Váltógomb világítása: Háttérvilágításos sebességfokozat-kiosztás; Száloptikás; Sötétben világító; LED (RGB); LED (egyszínű); Nincs; Egyéb
nl: Pookknop verlichting: Verlicht schakelpatroon; Glasvezel; Glow-in-the-dark; Led (RGB); Led (één kleur); Geen; Overig
fr: Éclairage du pommeau de levier de vitesses: Grille de vitesse rétroéclairée; Fibre optique; Phosphorescent; DEL (RVB); DEL (monocouleur); Aucun; Autre
pt-BR: Manopla de câmbio iluminação: Padrão de marcha retroiluminado; Fibra ótica; Brilha no escuro; LED (RGB); LED (cor única); Nenhum; Outro
pt-PT: Iluminação do botão da alavanca de mudanças: Padrão de mudança retroiluminado; Fibra ótica; Brilha no escuro; LED (RGB); LED (uma cor); Nenhuma; Outra
el: Φωτισμός πόμολου ταχυτήτων: Μοτίβο ταχυτήτων με οπίσθιο φωτισμό; Οπτική ίνα; Φωσφοριζέ; LED (RGB); LED (μονόχρωμο); Κανένα; Άλλο
th: ไฟส่องสว่างหัวเกียร์: รูปแบบเกียร์เรืองแสง; ไฟเบอร์ออปติก; เรืองแสงในที่มืด; LED (RGB); LED (สีเดียว); ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Осветление на топката на скоростния лост: Светеща схема на предавките; Фиброоптично; Фосфоресциращо; LED (RGB); LED (едноцветно); Без; Друго
cs: Osvětlení řadicí páky: Podsvícené schéma řazení; Optické vlákno; Svítící ve tmě; LED (RGB); LED (jednobarevné); Žádné; Jiné
nb: Belysning av girspaken: Bakgrunnsbelyst girmønster; Fiberoptisk; Selvlysende; LED (RGB); LED (ensfarget); Ingen; Annet
da: Belysning i gearknop: Baggrundsbelyst gearmønster; Fiberoptisk; Selvlysende; LED (RGB); LED (ensfarvet); Ingen; Andet
lt-LT: Pavarų rankenėlės apšvietimas: Pavarų schema su foniniu apšvietimu; Šviesolaidinis; Švytintis tamsoje; LED (RGB); LED (vienos spalvos); Nėra; Kita
de: Beleuchtung des Schaltknaufs: Hintergrundbeleuchtetes Schaltschema; Glasfaser; Nachleuchtend; LED (RGB); LED (einfarbig); Keine; Sonstige
vi: Đèn chiếu sáng cần số: Sơ đồ sang số có đèn nền; Cáp quang; Dạ quang; Đèn LED (RGB); Đèn LED (đơn sắc); Không có; Khác
tr: Vites topuzu aydınlatması: Arkadan aydınlatmalı vites şeması; Fiber optik; Karanlıkta parlayan; LED (RGB); LED (tek renkli); Yok; Diğer
sl-SI: Osvetlitev glave prestavne ročice: Osvetljen vzorec prestav; Optična vlakna; Sveti v temi; LED (RGB); LED (enobarvna); Brez; Drugo
en: Shift knob illumination: Backlit shift pattern; Fiber-optic; Glow-in-the-dark; LED (RGB); LED (single-color); None; Other
ro-RO: Iluminarea mânerului schimbătorului: Diagramă cu iluminare de fundal; Fibră optică; Fosforescent; LED (RGB); LED (o singură culoare); Fără; Altele
hr-HR: Osvjetljenje ručice mjenjača: Osvijetljena shema brzina; Optička vlakna; Svijetli u mraku; LED (RGB); LED (jedna boja); Bez; Drugo
ja: シフトノブ照明: バックライト付きシフトパターン; 光ファイバー; 蓄光; LED (RGB); LED (単色); なし; その他
it: Illuminazione del pomello del cambio: Schema marce retroilluminato; Fibra ottica; Fluorescente; LED (RGB); LED (monocolore); Nessuna; Altro